Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 7

Distribution

30-2-701. Distribution of balance — Final settlement.

Upon the payment of all claims that are not contested and upon provision being made for expenses of administration, obligations on account of taxes and assessments that have not been settled, claims not due and undetermined contested claims, together with costs and expenses of litigation, the personal representative shall pay any balance remaining in the personal representative's hands to the distributees or legatees entitled to it, unless granted additional time by the court, or by the terms of the instrument under which the personal representative is acting, and thereafter, when all other legal liabilities have been paid, and the balance remaining has been delivered to those entitled to it or paid to the state treasurer, to be handled in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1, relating to unclaimed property or administered as in § 30-2-402; provided, that in the event of insolvency, the personal representative shall make and file with the court a final settlement of the estate in accordance with chapter 2, part 6 of this title.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 7; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.8 (Williams, § 8196.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1301; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 9; 2017, ch. 280, § 6.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “in accordance with chapter 2, part 6 of this title” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 280, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Equality in dividing, § 31-5-101.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 790, 794, 836.

Law Reviews.

Legal Rights and Issues Surrounding Conception, Pregnancy and Birth, 39 Vand. L. Rev. 597 (1986).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

30-2-702. Distributees who cannot be located, infants or persons adjudicated incompetent — Procedure for payment of shares.

Whenever the personal representative of the estate of any deceased person in this state is ready to make a final report and settlement, and is prevented or precluded from making final settlement, because there is no personal representative of the estate of a deceased distributee to receive the share due that distributee or one (1) or more payees or distributees cannot be located or for any reason refuses to receive the share due that distributee, the personal representative shall pay or deliver the share due any such distributee to the state treasurer, to be handled in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1, relating to unclaimed property, and show the payment or delivery in the report.

In cases involving payees or distributees who are infants or persons adjudicated incompetent and without guardian or conservator authorized to receive the property, the personal representative, before making final settlement, shall file a petition in the court in which the estate is being administered setting out this fact and pray for the appointment of a guardian or conservator, unless petition is made pursuant to § 34-1-104.

The court shall appoint a guardian or conservator, if practicable, or if impracticable, order the property belonging to such infant or person adjudicated incompetent paid or delivered into the state treasury, unless distribution is ordered pursuant to § 34-1-104.

The payment or delivery shall be shown in the report and settlement of the personal representative, exhibiting the receipt of the guardian or state treasurer, as the case may be.

If the personal representative of the estate of a deceased person is unable to locate a distributee and that distributee's share of the estate is either personal property of nominal value or a monetary legacy of nominal value, the personal representative may request instructions from the court concerning the amount, if any, which should be spent in locating the distributee and whether the amount spent in locating the distributee should be a general expense of the estate or a charge against the lost distributee's share and the disposition of the property if the distributee cannot be found, which disposition may include the authority to sell any tangible personal property.

Acts 1945, ch. 126, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.9 (Williams, § 8334.1); Acts 1963, ch. 158, § 1; 1974, ch. 438, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1302; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 1; 1987, ch. 322, §§ 10-12; 1988, ch. 854, § 9; 1999, ch. 491, § 6; 2011, ch. 47, §§ 22, 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Accounting by representative, § 30-2-601.

Application for distributive share or legacy, § 30-2-710.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 791, 798, 830.

Collateral References.

Authority of guardian ad litem or next friend to make agreement to drop or compromise will contest or withdraw objections to probate. 42 A.L.R.2d 1319.

Right to partial distribution of estate or distribution of particular assets, prior to final closing. 18 A.L.R.3d 1173.

30-2-703. Disposition of shares — Application and claim for share.

Shares so placed in the state treasury shall not become the property of the state, but shall be and remain trust property demandable at any time by the owner or by the guardian of any owner, distributee or by the personal representative of any deceased owner.

Any person lawfully entitled to receive any money paid into the state treasury pursuant to § 30-2-702 may claim the amount due in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1, governing the disposition of unclaimed property. The state treasurer shall pay the amount, as in other cases, out of any money in the treasury; provided, the state shall not be liable for interest on any fund or funds paid into the state treasury under this law.

Property delivered to the treasurer pursuant to § 30-2-702, may be claimed in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1, governing the disposition of unclaimed property.

Acts 1945, ch. 126, §§ 2-4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.10 (Williams, §§ 8334.2-8334.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1303; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 2; 1987, ch. 322, §§ 13, 14.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed. Phillips and Robinson), §§ 791, 830.

30-2-704. Refunding bonds.

Every legatee and distributee, or representative of a legatee or distributee, who applies for payment of that person's portion of the decedent's estate, or any part thereof, prior to the time provided by law, shall, before receiving the payment, give bond with two (2) or more sufficient sureties, or one (1) corporate surety, in double the amount to be paid, payable to the state, conditioned that if any debt or debts truly owing by the deceased shall be afterwards sued for and recovered or be otherwise duly made to appear, the legatee or distributee shall refund and pay the ratable part of the debt or debts out of the share or part so allotted to the legatee or distributee.

Code 1858, § 2316 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 7; 1789, ch. 23, § 2); Shan., § 4053; mod. Code 1932, § 8336; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8336; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1304.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 694, 795.

30-2-705. Recording, filing, and verity of bond.

The executor or administrator shall bring the bond into the proper court at the next session after its date, and it shall be spread on the minutes, and the original lodged in the office of the clerk, and the bond and the copy on the minutes shall have the verity and character of records.

Code 1858, § 2317 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 3); Shan., § 4054; Code 1932, § 8337; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1305.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 795.

30-2-706. Scire facias against obligors in refunding bond — Execution.

Where an executor or administrator has pleaded fully administered, no assets, or not sufficient assets to satisfy the plaintiff's or complainant's demand, and that plea has been found in favor of the defendant, and judgment has been recovered against the defendent, to be levied on the assets of the deceased, the creditor, on the creditor's motion, may have scire facias against the obligors in the bond, to show cause why execution should not be issued against them for the amount of the judgment.

If there is judgment against the defendants to scire facias, or any of them, execution may issue on the judgment against the proper goods and chattels, lands and tenements of the defendant or defendants.

Code 1858, §§ 2318, 2319 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 3); Shan., §§ 4055, 4056; Code 1932, §§ 8338, 8339; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1306, 30-1307.

Cross-References. Defense may be made on scire facias, § 25-3-128.

Issue found against representatives, § 30-2-413.

Personalty exhausted, proceeding to subject realty, § 30-2-410.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 796.

30-2-707. Receipt for legacy or share.

Every person interested in the distribution of an estate shall execute to the executor, administrator, clerk, or person whose duty it is to distribute the estate, a receipt for that person's legacy, distributive share, or interest in the estate, upon payment of the same. It shall be necessary for the receipt to be executed under penalty of perjury or otherwise sworn before the clerk or a notary public. In the event that one (1) or more distributees refuse to acknowledge receipt of their respective share, the personal representative shall proceed to close the estate in accordance with chapter 2, part 6 of this title. The receipt shall be in a form developed by the administrative office of the courts. The form shall be posted on the website of the administrative office of the courts where it can be copied by the legatee or distributee or provided to the legatee or distributee by the court or the court clerk.

Code 1858, §§ 2320, 2321, 2323 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1855-1856, ch. 87); Shan., §§ 4057, 4058, 4060; Code 1932, §§ 8340, 8341, 8343; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1308, 30-1309, 30-1311; Acts 1986, ch. 580, § 3; 2017, ch. 280, § 7.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the second sentence which read: “It shall not be necessary for the receipt to be sworn or otherwise acknowledged before the clerk or a notary public.”; and added the third through fifth sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 280, § 8. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 799, 1144.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1309.

30-2-708. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 30-2-708 (Code 1858, § 2322 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 49, §§ 2, 3); Shan., § 4059; mod. Code 1932, § 8342; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1310), concerning the authority of the clerk for recording receipts, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 580, § 4.

30-2-709. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 30-2-709 (Code 1858, § 2324 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 49, § 7); Shan., § 4061; Code 1932, § 8344; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1312; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 22), concerning fees, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.

30-2-710. Application to compel payment of distributive share or legacy.

Any distributee or legatee of the estate may, after the expiration of eighteen (18) months from the grant of letters, apply to the probate or chancery court of the county in which administration was taken out, to compel the payment of the distributee's or legatee's distributive share or legacy.

The application shall be by petition or bill, shall set forth the claim of the applicant as legatee or distributee, shall allege that the assets of the estate are more than sufficient to pay the debts, charges, and other claims, if any, entitled to priority, and be verified, by affidavit.

The proceedings under the application shall be conducted as other equitable actions, and heard and determined summarily as soon as practicable.

Code 1858, §§ 2312-2314 (deriv. Acts 1723, ch. 10, § 4; 1762, ch. 5, §§ 23, 26); Shan., §§ 4048-4050; Code 1932, §§ 8347-8349; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1313 — 30-1315.

Cross-References. Award of execution, § 30-2-612.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 669, 832-834.

Law Reviews.

Decedent's Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

Equity — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (T.A. Smedley), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 896 (1962).

Executors and Administrators — Administrator's Liability for Services Rendered Estate, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 824 (1939).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-2-711. Affidavit of pedigree.

An affidavit before a commissioner of this state, or before any consul or notary public, as to the pedigree or right as legatee or distributee of any person, may be received as prima facie evidence of the pedigree or right by any personal representative in case no contest arises.

Code 1858, § 2315 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 4); Shan., § 4052; mod. Code 1932, § 8350; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1316.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 826, 834.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

30-2-712. Affidavit of heirship.

Affidavits duly sworn to upon the personal knowledge of the affiant before an officer entitled to administer oaths in the jurisdiction where the affidavit is made, setting forth any fact or facts concerning the relationship of any parties to persons deceased, or containing a statement of any facts pertinent to be ascertained in determining the persons legally entitled to any part of the estate of the decedent at the time of the decedent's death, shall be accepted for registration, upon presentation, by the registers of deeds in the several counties of the state upon the payment to the register of the usual fees for the recording of instruments entitled under the laws to be recorded.

The register to whom any such affidavit may be presented for registration shall record the same either in special books kept for this purpose or in the books where deeds are recorded, and in indexing the affidavits the register shall note the instruments as “affidavits of heirship,” indexing the name of the decedent as vendor and the names of those listed as heirs as vendees.

Any such affidavit duly sworn to and recorded, or a certified copy of the affidavit if the original is shown to be lost, shall be received as evidence in any court in the state in the county in which the affidavit is recorded as prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit; provided, however, that no such affidavit shall be used as evidence in any court except in a suit or proceeding in which may be involved the question of the right of a person or persons to succeed to or to receive the property of the decedent named in the affidavit, and then only to establish those facts, or in the criminal court in aid of the prosecution of the maker of the affidavit on the ground that it was and is false. Such affidavits filed with respect to the estates of persons heretofore deceased shall be received for registration and may be used with the same effect as affidavits as to persons dying hereafter.

Any such affidavit that has been copied in the county register's records for twenty (20) years or more before being offered in evidence shall not be rejected as evidence because of any formal defect in the form of the jurat attached thereto.

Any person feeling aggrieved by the recording of any such affidavit, may, at any time within six (6) years of the recording of the affidavit, bring a suit in the chancery court of the county where the affidavit may be recorded, challenging the verity of any or all of the facts that may be stated in the affidavit, and if the court finds any facts set forth in the affidavit are not true according to the proof, it shall order so much of the affidavit as it may find to be false to be expunged from the records of the county. In any proceeding challenging the truthfulness of any fact set forth in any such affidavit, the burden of proof to show the truthfulness of the statement shall rest upon the defendants to the proceeding, and all persons whose interests might be affected by the suit shall be made parties defendant. Any such suit shall be local to the county in which the affidavit may be recorded and nonresident defendants shall be made parties by the usual procedure of publication and the mailing by the clerk and master of a copy of the bill to the last known address of each defendant.

If an affidavit has been recorded in more than one county of the state, the action may be brought in any one of those counties; and a certified copy of the judgment or decree of the court in that cause expunging the affidavit, or any part of the affidavit, may be filed for recordation in any of the other counties in which the affidavit may have been recorded; and the recordation of the certified copy of the judgment or decree shall be as effective to work the expunction of the affidavit there recorded as if the suit had been instituted and prosecuted to a conclusion in that county.

Whoever willfully, corruptly and falsely swears to any statement in any such affidavit known by the person to be false, or about which the person does not have sufficiently definite knowledge to justify the making of such a sworn statement, and the statement is false, commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1937, ch. 123, §§ 1-6; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 8350.1-8350.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1201 — 30-1206; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 28.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 826, 834.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1402.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

30-2-713. Satisfaction of pecuniary bequests, devises or transfers by distribution in kind — Agreements with beneficiaries and governmental authorities.

Whenever an executor, administrator with will annexed or a trustee is empowered under the will or trust of a decedent to satisfy a pecuniary bequest, devise or transfer in trust, in kind with assets at their value for federal estate tax purposes, that fiduciary, in order to implement such a bequest, devise or transfer in trust, must, unless the governing instrument provides otherwise, distribute assets, including cash, fairly representative of appreciation or depreciation in the value of all property thus available for distribution in satisfaction of the pecuniary bequest, devise or transfer.

This section is not intended to change the law presently applicable to fiduciaries in this state, but is a statement of the fiduciary principles applicable to fiduciaries and is declaratory of the present law of this state.

The personal representative of an estate and trustees are authorized to enter into agreements with beneficiaries and with governmental authorities, agreeing to make distribution in accordance with this section for any purpose that they deem to be in the best interests of the estate, including the purpose of protecting and preserving the federal estate tax marital deduction for a decedent without regard to the decedent's date of death, or the state inheritance tax marital deduction for a decedent dying before January 1, 2016, as applicable to the estate. The guardian or conservator of a surviving beneficiary or the personal representative of a deceased beneficiary is empowered to enter into agreements pursuant to this subsection (c) for and on behalf of the beneficiary or deceased beneficiary.

Acts 1965, ch. 284, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 30-1317; Acts 1984, ch. 579, § 1; 2017, ch. 290, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16 provided that section 4 of the act, which amended this section, should take effect January 1, 2017. However, since a public chapter cannot become effective on a date prior to becoming law, the code commission deems the amendment by that act to take effect on July 23, 2017, in accordance with Tenn. Const. art. II, § 20. See Opinion of the Attorney General, June 25, 1982 (OAG 82-191).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “The personal representative of an estate and trustees are authorized to enter into agreements with beneficiaries and with governmental authorities, agreeing to make distribution in accordance with this section for any purpose that they deem to be in the best interests of the estate, including the purpose of protecting and preserving the federal estate tax or state inheritance tax marital deduction as applicable to the estate, and the guardian or conservator of a surviving beneficiary or the personal representative of a deceased beneficiary shall be empowered to enter into such agreements for and on behalf of the beneficiary or deceased beneficiary.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 23, 2017. See the Code Commission Notes.

Cross-References. Inheritance tax deductions, § 67-8-315.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 955, 986.

Law Reviews.

Inheritance Taxation — The “Tainted Asset” Rule: A Problem With Tennessee's Marital Deduction, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 643 (1981).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

The Marital Deduction — Effect of Revenue Procedure 64-19 (Robert W. Knolton), 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 493 (1966).

30-2-714. Recovery of assets after close of estate.

When all the debts of any deceased person are paid in full, and the administrator or executor of the deceased persons has resigned, or is dead, and there is no person representing the deceased person as administrator or executor, and there are claims due the estate of the decedent, that, from insolvency or other cause, were not collected by the administrator or executor of the decedent, then, the next of kin of the deceased persons may sue for, receive, and collect those claims in their own names; provided, however, that the claims so received shall be distributed in accordance with the statutes of descent and distribution, if the person left no will, but in the event the person left a last will and testament, then in accordance with the will.

If the claims, or any of them, were reduced to judgment in the lifetime of the decedent, or by the decedent's administrator or executor, then the judgment may be revived by scire facias in the name of the next of kin of the decedent, to enable the next of kin to enforce collection of the judgment.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4062, 4063; Code 1932, §§ 8345, 8346; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1401, 30-1402.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 496, 714.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).